Indiana, session 2026, SB186.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-2-21 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 21. Hoosier Family Leave Insurance Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "average weekly wage" means
the average weekly wage of a covered individual over a base period
established by the department.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "covered employer" means an
employer (as defined in IC 22-4-7) that is subject to the
unemployment compensation system under IC 22-4.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "covered individual" means:
(1) an employee of a covered employer; and
(2) any self-employed individual who elects coverage under
section 12 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "department" refers to the
department of workforce development established under
IC 22-4.1-2.
2026 IN 186—LS 6661/DI 141


Sec. 5. As used in this chapter "fund" refers to the Hoosier
family leave insurance trust fund established by section 10 of this
chapter.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "program" refers to the Hoosier
family leave insurance program established by section 9 of this
chapter.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "qualified family leave" means
leave taken by a covered individual for one (1) or more of the
following reasons:
(1) The:
(A) birth of a child of the covered individual; and
(B) care of the child within twelve (12) months after birth.
(2) The:
(A) placement of a child with the covered individual for
adoption or foster care; and
(B) care of the child within twelve (12) months after
placement.
(3) To care for a child, spouse, or parent of the covered
individual who has a serious health condition.
(4) The covered individual's own serious health condition, to
the extent that the condition is not otherwise covered by an
employer sponsored short term disability plan.
(5) Any other purpose designated by the department by rule
that is consistent with the federal Family and Medical Leave
Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. 2601 et seq.).
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "state average weekly wage"
means the state average weekly wage as determined annually by
the department.
Sec. 9. The Hoosier family leave insurance program is
established to provide wage replacement benefits to covered
individuals during periods of qualified family leave.
Sec. 10. (a) The Hoosier family leave insurance trust fund is
established for the purpose of:
(1) depositing contributions from covered individuals; and
(2) paying benefits and administrative costs for the program.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the department.
(c) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Contributions from covered individuals made under
section 11(a) of this chapter.
(2) Voluntary contributions from covered employers made
under section 11(b) of this chapter.
(3) All interest and earnings on investments of the funds.
2026 IN 186—LS 6661/DI 141


(d) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(e) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(f) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 11. (a) Each covered employer shall, in the manner
prescribed by the department:
(1) withhold from the wages of each covered individual an
amount equal to the contribution rate established under
subsection (c) or (d); and
(2) remit those amounts to the fund.
(b) A covered employer may elect to contribute additional
amounts to the fund on behalf of covered individuals as an
employer provided benefit.
(c) The initial contribution rate for a covered individual is
five-tenths percent (0.5%) of the lesser of:
(1) the covered individual's wages; or
(2) the Social Security wage base or another wage cap as
designated by the department.
(d) After obtaining an independent actuarial analysis, the
department may adjust the contribution rate not more than once
per year to ensure the actuarial soundness of the fund. The
contribution rate may be adjusted to an amount that is:
(1) at least four-tenths percent (0.4%); and
(2) not more than six-tenths percent (0.6%);
of the lesser of a wage described in subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2).
(e) The department shall provide public notice of any
adjustment made under subsection (d).
Sec. 12. (a) A self-employed individual may elect to participate
in the program for an initial period of not less than three (3) years.
(b) If a self-employed individual elects to participate in the
program, the individual shall remit contributions to the fund at an
amount equal to the contribution rate established under section 11
of this chapter.
Sec. 13. (a) A covered individual is eligible to receive benefits
under this chapter if the individual:
(1) has satisfied minimum earnings or contribution
requirements established by the department; and
(2) is:
2026 IN 186—LS 6661/DI 141


(A) taking qualified family leave; and
(B) not receiving full wage replacement from the covered
employer.
(b) A covered individual may receive not more than twelve (12)
weeks of family leave insurance benefits in a benefit year for leave
that is taken not more than twelve (12) months after the qualifying
event.
(c) Weekly benefits under the program must be calculated as
sixty percent (60%) of a covered individual's average weekly wage,
subject to a maximum weekly benefit amount equal to a percentage
that is:
(1) at least fifty percent (50%); and
(2) not more than sixty percent (60%);
of the state average weekly wage as specified annually by the
department to maintain fund solvency.
(d) The department may adopt graduated or tiered benefit
formulas within the limits of subsection (c) to ensure that lower
wage workers receive proportionally greater wage replacement
while maintaining the solvency of the fund.
(e) Benefits under this chapter are in addition to any rights or
protections available under the federal Family and Medical Leave
Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. 2601 et seq.) and any employer provider
paid leave. However, a covered employer may coordinate or offset
benefits as provided in the covered employer's written policy and
in rules adopted by the department.
Sec. 14. (a) This chapter does not create new job protection
requirements for covered employers beyond those otherwise
required by federal or state law.
(b) A covered employer may:
(1) voluntarily provide job protection or continuation of
benefits for covered individuals who receive benefits under
this chapter; and
(2) describe the job protection or continuation of benefits
provided under subdivision (1) in an employee handbook or
written leave policy.
Sec. 15. (a) The department shall administer this chapter using,
to the greatest extent practicable, existing personnel, systems, and
infrastructure used for the unemployment compensation system or
other wage reporting programs.
(b) The department may contract with a third party
administrator or licensed insurer to perform some or all of the
administrative functions of the program if the costs to contract
2026 IN 186—LS 6661/DI 141


with the third party administrator or licensed insurer are paid
exclusively from the fund.
(c) The department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 necessary
to implement this chapter.
(d) Any rules adopted to implement this chapter may not impose
unfunded mandates on covered employers beyond the obligation to
withhold and remit employee contributions as required by section
11(a) of this chapter.
Sec. 16. (a) The department may not commence payment of
benefits under this chapter until the department determines, based
on an independent actuarial analysis, that projected contributions
will be sufficient to pay projected benefits and administrative
expenses of the program.
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create a vested
right to benefits that exceed the balance available in the fund.
SECTION 2. IC 22-4.1-4-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 276, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) The department shall do the
following:
(1) Administer the Wagner-Peyser program, the WIOA, a free
public labor exchange, and related federal and state employment
and training programs as directed by the governor.
(2) Formulate and implement an employment and training plan as
required by the WIOA, and the Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. 49
et seq.).
(3) Coordinate activities with all state agencies and departments
that either provide employment and training related services or
operate appropriate resources or facilities, to maximize Indiana's
efforts to provide employment opportunities for economically
disadvantaged individuals, dislocated workers, and others with
substantial barriers to employment.
(4) Apply for, receive, disburse, allocate, and account for all
funds, grants, gifts, and contributions of money, property, labor,
and other things of value from public and private sources,
including grants from agencies and instrumentalities of the state
and the federal government.
(5) Enter into agreements with the United States government that
may be required as a condition of obtaining federal funds related
to activities of the department.
(6) Enter into contracts or agreements and cooperate with local
governmental units or corporations, including profit or nonprofit
corporations, or combinations of units and corporations to carry
2026 IN 186—LS 6661/DI 141


out the duties of the department imposed by this chapter,
including contracts for the establishment and administration of
employment and training offices and the delegation of the
department's administrative, monitoring, and program
responsibilities and duties set forth in this article.
(7) Perform other services and activities that are specified in
contracts for payments or reimbursement of the costs made with
the Secretary of Labor, any federal, state, or local public agency
or administrative entity, or a private for-profit or nonprofit
organization under the WIOA.
(8) Enter into contracts or agreements and cooperate with entities
that provide career and technical education to carry out the duties
imposed by this article.
(9) Serve as the state advisory body required under the federal
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 under 29
U.S.C. 3101 et seq., including reauthorizations of WIOA.
(b) The department shall distribute federal funds made available for
employment training in accordance with:
(1) the WIOA, and other applicable federal laws; and
(2) the plan prepared under subsection (c)(1).
(c) In addition to the duties prescribed in subsections (a) and (b), the
department shall do the following:
(1) Implement the postsecondary career and technical education
programming plan prepared under IC 22-4.1-19-4 (before its
repeal).
(2) Upon request of the budget director, prepare a legislative
budget request for state and federal funds for employment
training. The budget director shall determine the period to be
covered by the budget request.
(3) Make or cause to be made studies of the needs for various
types of programs that are related to employment training and
authorized under the WIOA.
(4) Distribute state funds made available for employment training
that have been appropriated by the general assembly in
accordance with the general assembly appropriation.
(5) Collect from each employer subject to IC 22-4 the following
information in the form and manner prescribed by the department:
(A) The Standard Occupational Classification code applicable
to each employee as prescribed by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor or primary
job title as recorded and reported by the employer.
(B) Whether each employee is:
2026 IN 186—LS 6661/DI 141


(i) classified by the employer as full-time, part-time, intern,
or apprentice; or
(ii) designated as a seasonal worker pursuant to a decision
issued by the department.
(C) The hourly rate of pay for each employee.
(6) Enter into data sharing agreements and transmit the data
collected under subdivision (5), in addition to any other relevant
data, to agencies deemed appropriate by the department for:
(A) assessing outcomes of education and workforce programs;
(B) evaluating educational and workforce training
investments;
(C) informing labor market analysis; and
(D) conducting economic research.
(7) Minimize employer reporting burdens, where feasible,
through:
(A) aligning and streamlining definitions and requirements for
quarterly wage and employment reports;
(B) deploying user friendly application programming
interfaces; and
(C) other means to simplify reporting processes.
(8) Establish an employer outreach and communications
campaign in collaboration with statewide business and industry
associations to increase the number of employers that report
accurate data under subdivision (5).
(9) Administer the Hoosier family leave insurance program
under IC 22-2-21.
2026 IN 186—LS 6661/DI 141